Utah statutes.
31A-29-116.   Notice of availability.

The commissioner shall establish rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, governing notice of availability which is to be given by insurers to potential enrollees in the pool.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

